Washington statutes.
RCW 13.64.070

Declaration of emancipation—Voidable.

A declaration of emancipation obtained by fraud is voidable. The voiding of any such declaration shall not affect any obligations, rights, or interests that arose during the period the declaration was in effect.

[ 1993 c 294 s 7.]